Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-419
Hospital, defined.

(1) Hospital means a facility where diagnosis, treatment, medical care, obstetrical care, nursing care, or related services are provided on an outpatient basis or on an inpatient basis for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to persons who have an illness, injury, or deformity or to aged or infirm persons requiring or receiving convalescent care.

(2) Hospital includes a facility or part of a facility which provides space for a general acute hospital, a rehabilitation hospital, a long-term care hospital, a critical access hospital, or a psychiatric or mental hospital.

(3) Hospital does not include a health care practitioner facility in which persons do not receive care or treatment for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 19.